Tennessee statutes. Title 9 Public Finances
Part 2

Issuance and Sale of Bonds

9-9-201. Obligations subject to funding.

All general obligation bonds already issued or which may hereafter be issued by the state of Tennessee shall be subject to financing, refinancing and retirement under this chapter.

Acts 1943, ch. 136, § 1; C. Supp. 1950, § 1811.6 (Williams, § 1811.29a); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-912.

9-9-202. Authorization to issue bonds — Purposes, contents, form, redemption of bonds — Interest rate agreements — Jurisdiction.

For the purpose of effectuating this chapter, the funding board is hereby authorized to issue bonds of the state of Tennessee in amounts and for purposes heretofore or hereafter authorized by the general assembly. Each issue of bonds may be for one (1) or more purposes, irrespective whether the purposes have been provided for by the same legislative enactments, and, unless otherwise provided by law, shall be direct general obligations of the state of Tennessee for the payment of which as to both principal and interest the full faith and credit of the state is irrevocably pledged, and shall be further secured by the pledge of special revenues pursuant to this chapter.

The bonds shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates payable at such time or times and at such place or places, shall mature at such time or times, and shall be payable in such medium of payment, as may be determined by the board.

The bonds may be made redeemable before maturity at the option of the board at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the board prior to the issuance of the bonds.

The board shall determine the form of the bonds, including the form of interest coupons to be attached thereto, and the manner of execution or authentication of the bonds and coupons, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of the principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the state.

The bonds may be issued in coupon or registered form, or both, as the board may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of coupon bonds as to principal only or also as to both principal and interest, and for the exchange and interchange of registered and coupon bonds.

In case any member or officer of the board whose signature or facsimile signature thereof shall appear on the bonds or coupons shall cease to be a member or officer of the board before the delivery thereof, such signature or facsimile signature nevertheless shall be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such person had remained a member or officer of the board until after such delivery.

With respect to all or any portion of any issue of bonds issued hereunder, the funding board may authorize and enter into interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, and other interest rate hedging agreements under such terms and agreements as the funding board may determine, including, without limitation, provisions permitting the funding board to pay to or receive from any person or entity any loss of benefits under such agreement upon early termination thereof or default under such agreement.

When entering into any contracts or agreements facilitating the issuance and sale of bonds, including contracts or agreements providing for liquidity and credit enhancement and reimbursement agreements relating thereto, interest rate swap or exchange agreements, agreements establishing interest rate floors or ceilings or both, other interest rate hedging agreements, and agreements with the purchaser of the bonds authorized under this section evidencing a transaction bearing a reasonable relationship to this state and also to another state or nation, the state funding board may agree in the written contract or agreement that the rights and remedies of the parties thereto shall be governed by the laws of this state or the laws of such other state or nation; provided, that jurisdiction over the state funding board against which an action on such a contract or agreement is brought shall lie solely in a court in Tennessee which would otherwise have jurisdiction of actions brought in contract against the board.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 2 (Williams, § 1811.13); 1977, ch. 3, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-913; Acts 1999, ch. 425, § 1; 2010, ch. 982, § 2.

Cross-References. Prepayment rights on face of bonds, §9-1-104.

9-9-203. Authority to offer bonds for sale and determine interest rates — Delivery periods.

The funding board is hereby authorized, empowered and directed to offer for sale any and all bonds heretofore or hereafter authorized to be issued by the funding board, and to determine by resolution the maximum rate or rates of interest which such bonds shall bear.

The funding board may enter into an agreement to sell its bonds under this chapter providing for delivery of its bonds not more than five (5) years or such greater period of time if recommended by the comptroller of the treasury or the comptroller's designee, from the date of execution of such agreement or, in the case of refunding bonds, the earlier of the first date on which the bonds being refunded can be optionally redeemed resulting in cost savings or be optionally redeemed at par.

Acts 1957, ch. 186, § 1; T.C.A., § 9-921; Acts 1999, ch. 425, § 2.

Cross-References. Bonds for medical arts buildings, title 68, ch. 11, part 6.

Waterworks construction loans, title 68, ch. 221, part 5.

9-9-204. Removal of statutory limitations on interest rates.

Whenever the interest rate or rates determined by resolution of the funding board exceed those contained in the act or acts authorizing the issuance of such bonds, the rate or rates determined by the funding board shall prevail, it being the legislative intent to remove all statutory limitations regarding maximum interest rates and all such limitations are hereby expressly removed; provided, that the maximum rate determined by the funding board in no instance shall exceed the rate as provided by §47-14-103.

Acts 1957, ch. 186, § 2; T.C.A., § 9-922; Acts 1981, ch. 128, § 3; 2010, ch. 982, § 4.

9-9-205. Sale of bonds — Appropriation of funds in lieu of sale of bonds.

Any and all bonds issued by the funding board shall be sold in such manner and at such times as may be approved by the funding board.

If there are unappropriated funds in the general fund, highway fund or state debt service fund of the state sufficient to defray the cost of the betterments, improvements, buildings, and projects for which bonds shall have been authorized, or any part thereof, then the funding board may request an allocation from such unappropriated funds in lieu of issuing bonds in such amount. There is hereby appropriated upon any such request of the funding board from the general fund, highway fund or state debt service fund a sum sufficient to pay the cost, or any part thereof, of such betterments, improvements, buildings, and projects, as the funding board shall have been authorized to finance through the issuance of bonds. For the purposes of this section, the use of highway funds shall be limited to highway projects.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, if there are notes of the state outstanding that were issued in anticipation of the issuance of bonds that mature without having been funded by the issuance of bonds, the funding board shall, without further authorization, apply funds appropriated to the state debt service fund for amortization of authorized and unissued bonds not required for the payment of principal of and interest on bonds which have been issued to the retirement of a like amount of principal or interest on such notes. There is hereby appropriated from such funds in the state debt service fund a sum sufficient to retire the principal of and interest on such notes, and, upon the retirement of such principal, the authorization for the issuance of such principal amount of the bonds for the purposes for which the notes were issued shall become void.

Acts 1957, ch. 186, § 3; 1977, ch. 3, § 9; T.C.A., § 9-923; Acts 1982, ch. 833, §§ 1, 2; 1998, ch. 582, § 3; 2003, ch. 10, § 1; 2009, ch. 4, § 1; 2010, ch. 982, § 3; 2012, ch. 572, § 1; 2016, ch. 849, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2003, ch. 10, § 3 provided that any language inconsistent with the provisions in this section in any general obligation bond enacted prior to April 2, 2003, shall be of no effect.

Acts 2009, ch. 4, § 2 provided that any language inconsistent with the provisions of §9-9-205(a) in any general obligation bond act enacted prior to March 10, 2009, shall be of no effect.

9-9-206. Application of law to other statutes.

Parts 1 and 2 of this chapter shall be applicable to existing statutes authorizing the issuance of bonds, as well as acts of this and subsequent general assemblies.

Notwithstanding any other general law, parts 1 and 2 of this chapter shall prevail. However, bonds heretofore or hereafter authorized by the general assembly to be issued by the state funding board may be sold pursuant to the Baccalaureate Education Savings for Tennessee Act, compiled in title 49, chapter 7, part 9.

Acts 1957, ch. 186, §§ 4, 5; 1977, ch. 3, § 10; T.C.A., § 9-924; Acts 1989, ch. 190, § 9.

9-9-207. Issuance of refunding bonds.

The funding board may issue general obligation refunding bonds to refund outstanding obligations previously issued under the authority of this chapter, upon the determination by the board that such bonds are necessary:

To accomplish cost savings to the public;

For the administrative convenience of the board;

To pay or discharge all or any part of an issue or series of bonds, including any interest thereon, in arrears or to become due and for the payment of which sufficient funds are not available; or

To eliminate bond covenants that have been determined to be burdensome to the state due to a change in circumstances if such elimination is not otherwise prohibited by law. Such determination shall be clearly stated in any resolution authorizing such refunding bonds and shall be conclusive.

The refunding bonds may be issued to pay or provide for the payment of principal, redemption premium, and accrued interest on the bonds to be refunded, and expenses related to the issuance of the refunding bonds, including discount and costs of issuance.

Refunding bonds may be sold as determined by the funding board, at public or private sale, in accordance with this chapter.

Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 13 (Williams, § 1811.24); modified; impl. am. Acts 1959, ch. 9, § 8; Acts 1977, ch. 3, § 4; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-914; Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 4; 2013, ch. 176, § 9.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 1 provided that the act, which amended subsection (a), shall be known and may be cited as the “Hawkins-Wilson Act.”

Acts 2013, ch. 176, § 11 provided that nothing in the act, which amended subsection (a), shall be construed so as to impair the obligation of any contract made by the state of Tennessee upon any bond of the state issued under title 9, chapter 9 outstanding as of July 1, 2013.

9-9-208. Authorization to cancel bonds — Factors in determination.

The funding board is authorized, empowered and directed to cancel bonds authorized to be issued by the funding board upon its determination by resolution that one (1) of the following has occurred and the canceled amount of that bond authorization is no longer needed to fund the authorized project:

The project has been financed with commercial paper and the commercial paper has been retired in whole or in part without issuance of bonds;

The project was authorized to be financed with bonds but was financed in whole or in part with current funds;

The bonds were authorized but are no longer necessary for a governmental purpose; or

The amount of the remaining authorization is de minimis and as such will not be utilized.

Acts 2009, ch. 311, § 1; 2014, ch. 824, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Former §9-9-208 (Acts 1937, ch. 165, § 13 (Williams, § 1811.24); modified; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 9-915; Acts 1981, ch. 128, § 2), concerning the sale of refunding bonds, was repealed by Acts 1998, ch. 582, § 5, effective March 3, 1998.

Pursuant to Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Tennessee, Acts 2014, ch. 824 took effect on April 28, 2014.